Massachusetts, session 194th, S2188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the general laws are hereby amended by adding the following section:-
15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the
eleventh day of September as the September 11th Day of Remembrance in recognition of the
loss of life and service of first responders at the World Trade Center in New York City, New
York on September 11, 2001, and recommending that said day be observed in an appropriate
manner by the people.
of 1